en: Spinning Wheel Accessories
xx: Spinning Wheel Accessories
cs: Kolovrátky – příslušenství
da: Spinderok – tilbehør
de: Spinnzubehör
es: Accesorios para rueca
fr: Accessoires pour rouet
it: Accessori per filatoi
ja: 糸車関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor spinnewielen
no: Rokk-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do kołowrotków
pt: Acessórios para rodas de fiar
ru: Принадлежности для прялок
sv: Tillbehör till spinnrockar
tr: Çıkrık Aksesuarları

en: Stamp Blocks
xx: Stamp Blocks
cs: Razítkové rukojeti
da: Stempelklodser
de: Stempelblöcke
es: Placas de texto
fr: Bâtons pour tampons
it: Blocchi per timbri
ja: スタンプ ブロック
nl: Stempelblokken
no: Frimerkeblokker
pl: Bloczki do stempli
pt: Blocos para estampagem
ru: Блоки для штампов
sv: Stämpelblock
tr: Posta Pulu Blokları

en: Art & Crafting Tools
xx: Art & Crafting Tools
cs: Hobby pomůcky
da: Værktøjer til håndarbejde og hobby
de: Kunst- & Bastelwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas para manualidades
fr: Outils pour loisirs créatifs
it: Strumenti per hobby e artigianato
ja: アート・クラフト用具
nl: Handwerk- en hobbygereedschap
no: Kunst og håndverksutstyr
pl: Narzędzia dla artystów i rękodzielników
pt: Ferramentas para arte e artesanato
ru: Инструменты для рукоделия и хобби
sv: Hobbyverktyg
tr: Sanat ve El İşi Araçları

en: Blocking Mats
xx: Blocking Mats
cs: Fixační podložky
da: Udstrækningsmåtter
de: Spannmatten
es: Esterillas para ahormar
fr: Tapis de blocage
it: Tappetini di blocco per maglieria
ja: ブロッキング用マット
nl: Blokkeermatten
no: Underlagsmatter
pl: Maty do blokowania
pt: Folhas de fixação
ru: Коврики для вышивания
sv: Blockmattor
tr: Gerdirme Altlıkları

en: Blocking Wires
xx: Blocking Wires
cs: Fixační dráty
da: Udstrækningssnore
de: Spanndrähte
es: Hilos para ahormar
fr: Fils de blocage
it: Fili di blocco per maglieria
ja: ブロッキング用ワイヤー
nl: Blokkeerdraad
no: Underlagsgitter
pl: Druty do blokowania
pt: Fios de fixação
ru: Леска для вязания
sv: Blocktråd
tr: Gerdirme Telleri

en: Color Mixing Tools
xx: Color Mixing Tools
cs: Pomůcky pro míchání barev
da: Værktøjer til blanding af farver
de: Farbmischwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas para mezclar colores
fr: Outils de mélange de couleurs
it: Strumenti per mescolare i colori
ja: 色混合用具
nl: Gereedschap om kleuren  te mengen
no: Fargeblandingsutstyr
pl: Narzędzia do mieszania kolorów
pt: Ferramentas para mistura de cor
ru: Инструменты для смешивания красок
sv: Färgblandningsverktyg
tr: Renk Karıştırma Araçları

en: Palette Knives
xx: Palette Knives
cs: Malířské špachtle
da: Paletknive
de: Palettenmesser
es: Espátulas para pintura
fr: Couteaux à palette
it: Mestichini
ja: パレットナイフ
nl: Paletmessen
no: Palettkniver
pl: Noże malarskie
pt: Espátulas de pintura
ru: Мастихины
sv: Palettknivar
tr: Palet Bıçakları

en: Palettes
xx: Palettes
cs: Palety
da: Paletter
de: Farbpaletten
es: Paletas
fr: Palettes
it: Tavolozze
ja: パレット
nl: Schilderspaletten
no: Paletter
pl: Palety
pt: Paletas
ru: Палитры
sv: Paletter
tr: Paletler

en: Craft Cutting & Embossing Tools
xx: Craft Cutting & Embossing Tools
cs: Řezací a embosovací hobby pomůcky
da: Skære- og prægningsværktøjer til håndarbejde
de: Stanz- & Prägewerkzeuge für Kunstarbeiten
es: Herramientas de gofrado y recorte
fr: Outils de découpage et de gaufrage pour loisirs créatifs
it: Strumenti per taglio e goffratura
ja: クラフトカット・エンボス加工用具
nl: Gereedschap voor snij- en reliëfwerk
no: Skjæreverktøy og relieffverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do wycinania i wytłaczania
pt: Ferramentas para corte e gravação em relevo para artesanato
ru: Инструменты для резки бумаги и тиснения
sv: Verktyg för hobbyskärning och relieftryck
tr: El İşi Kesme ve Kabartma Araçları

en: Craft & Office Scissors
xx: Craft & Office Scissors
cs: Kancelářské a hobby nůžky
da: Skrædder- og papirsakse
de: Bastel- & Büroscheren
es: Tijeras de oficina y para manualidades
fr: Ciseaux de bureau et ciseaux pour loisirs créatifs
it: Forbici da ufficio e per attività creative
ja: クラフト用はさみ・オフィス用はさみ
nl: Hobby- en kantoorscharen
no: Sakser til håndverk og kontorbruk
pl: Nożyczki dla hobbystów i do biura
pt: Tesouras para artesanato e escritório
ru: Канцелярские ножницы и ножницы для рукоделия
sv: Hobby- och kontorssaxar
tr: El İşi ve Ofis Makasları

en: Craft Cutters & Embossers
xx: Craft Cutters & Embossers
cs: Raznice a reliéfní razítka
da: Skæremaskiner og maskiner til prægning
de: Stanzer & Präger für Kunstarbeiten
es: Cortadores y estampadores para manualidades
fr: Machines à couper et à gaufrer pour loisirs créatifs
it: Goffratrice e taglierini per attività creative
ja: クラフトカッター・エンボス加工用具
nl: Handwerkmessen en -reliëfpennen
no: Skjæreverktøy og relieffstempler
pl: Urządzenia do wycinania i wytłaczania
pt: Cortadores e impressoras de relevo para artesanato
ru: Станки для раскроя ткани и тиснения
sv: Hobbyskärare och reliefstämplar
tr: El İşi Kesiciler ve Kabartıcılar

en: Craft Knives
xx: Craft Knives
cs: Hobby nože
da: Håndarbejdsknive
de: Bastelmesser
es: Cúteres
fr: Couteaux de précision
it: Taglierini
ja: デザインナイフ
nl: Stanleymessen
no: Tapetkniver
pl: Skalpele modelarskie
pt: Canivetes
ru: Отделочные ножи с выдвижным лезвием
sv: Skärknivar
tr: Maket Bıçakları

en: Craft Scoring Tools
xx: Craft Scoring Tools
cs: Ohýbačky a rýhovače papíru
da: Papirskærere
de: Rill- & Perforiergeräte für Papier
es: Hendidoras y plegadoras de papel
fr: Outils d'entaille pour loisirs créatifs
it: Piegatrici e marcatori per carta
ja: 筋押し機
nl: Hulpmiddelen voor het vouwen van papier
no: Utstyr til papirbretting
pl: Noże do zaginania i nacinania papieru
pt: Ferramentas de vinco para artesanato
ru: Устройства для рилевки и гофрирования бумаги
sv: Pappersveckare
tr: El İşi Çentme Makineleri

en: Embossing Heat Tools
xx: Embossing Heat Tools
cs: Nástroje na embosování za tepla
da: Varmeværktøjer til prægning
de: Heißluftgeräte
es: Herramientas de calor para gofrado
fr: Outils de gaufrage thermique
it: Strumenti per goffratura a caldo
ja: エンボスヒーター
nl: Warmtegereedschap voor reliëfs
no: Varmeverktøy for preging
pl: Narzędzia do wytłaczania na gorąco
pt: Aparelhos para pirogravura
ru: Термоинструменты для тиснения
sv: Verktyg för relieftryck
tr: Kabartma Isı Aletleri

en: Embossing Pens & Styluses
xx: Embossing Pens & Styluses
cs: Pera na embossing
da: Prægning – penne
de: Prägestifte
es: Bolígrafos y stylus para gofrado
fr: Stylos et stylets à gaufrage
it: Penne e strumenti per goffratura
ja: エンボスペン
nl: Reliëfpennen
no: Pregepenner og stylus
pl: Pisaki do wytłaczania
pt: Canetas para gravação em alto relevo
ru: Ручки для тиснения
sv: Relieftryckpennor
tr: Kabartma Kalemleri ve Stylus Kalemler

en: Seam Rippers
xx: Seam Rippers
cs: Páradla švů
da: Opsprættere
de: Nahttrenner
es: Cortador de costuras
fr: Découseurs
it: Tagliapunti
ja: シームリッパー
nl: Tornmesjes
no: Sprettekniver
pl: Nożyki do szwów
pt: Abridores de casas
ru: Вспарыватели швов
sv: Sprättare
tr: Dikiş Sökme Aletleri

en: Thread & Yarn Cutters
xx: Thread & Yarn Cutters
cs: Řezačky nití a příze
da: Tråd og garn – sakse
de: Fadenabschneider
es: Cortadores de hilo
fr: Coupe-fils
it: Forbici taglia fili e taglia lana
ja: 糸切りばさみ
nl: Draad- en garenscharen
no: Tråd- og garnkuttere
pl: Obcinacze do nici i przędzy
pt: Discos cortadores de fios
ru: Резаки для нитей и пряжи
sv: Tråd- och garnskärare
tr: İplik ve Yün İpliği Kesme Aletleri

en: Craft Decoration Makers
xx: Craft Decoration Makers
cs: Dekorační hobby fixy
da: Apparater til bedarbejdning af dekorationsmaterialer
de: Dekorationswerkzeuge für Kunstarbeiten
es: Herramientas de decoración
fr: Machines à fabriquer des décorations pour loisirs créatifs
it: Strumenti per creare decorazioni
ja: クラフト装飾作成用具
nl: Handgereedschap voor decoratie
no: Utstyr til dekorasjonslaging
pl: Narzędzia do tworzenia ozdób
pt: Ferramentas para criação de decoração artesanal
ru: Принадлежности для изготовления украшений
sv: Hobbydekorationsverktyg
tr: El İşi Dekorasyon Malzemeleri

en: Craft Measuring & Marking Tools
xx: Craft Measuring & Marking Tools
cs: Měřicí a označovací hobby pomůcky
da: Måle- og markeringsværktøjer til håndarbejde
de: Mess- & Markierwerkzeuge für Kunstarbeiten
es: Herramientas para marcar y medir
fr: Outils de mesure et de traçage pour loisirs créatifs
it: Strumenti per marcare e misurare oggetti d'artigianato
ja: クラフト計測・印付け器具
nl: Meet- en aftekengereedschap
no: Verktøy til måling og merking av håndverk
pl: Narzędzia do mierzenia i oznaczania
pt: Ferramentas de medição e marcação para artesanato
ru: Инструменты для измерения и разметки
sv: Hobbyverktyg för mätning och markering
tr: El İşi Ölçüm ve İşaretleme Araçları

en: Art Brushes
xx: Art Brushes
cs: Umělecké štětce
da: Kunstmalepensler
de: Künstlerpinsel
es: Pinceles
fr: Pinceaux pour peinture
it: Pennelli per artisti
ja: 画筆
nl: Penselen
no: Kunstpensler
pl: Pędzle malarskie
pt: Pincéis de arte
ru: Художественные кисти
sv: Penslar
tr: Resim Fırçaları